tests/voicing.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../tur.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tur.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[twol] nouns with always voiceless cons":
    at<n><dat> : ata
    at<n><px3sp><nom> : atı
    at<n><pl><nom> : atlar
    at<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p2><sg> : atsın

  "[twol] nouns with always voiced cons":
    ad<n><dat> : ada
    ad<n><px3sp><nom> : adı
    ad<n><pl><nom> : adlar
    ad<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p2><sg> : adsın
    leb<n><dat> : lebe
    leb<n><px3sp><nom> : lebi
    leb<n><pl><nom> : lebler
    leb<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p2><sg> : lebsin
    dağ<n><dat> : dağa
    dağ<n><px3sp><nom> : dağı
    dağ<n><pl><nom> : dağlar
    dağ<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p2><sg> : dağsın
    jeolog<n><dat> : jeologa
    jeolog<n><px3sp><nom> : jeologu
    jeolog<n><pl><nom> : jeologlar
    jeolog<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p2><sg> : jeologsun

  "[twol] nouns with always variant cons, voiceless":
    kitap<n><pl><nom> : kitaplar
    kitap<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p2><sg> : kitapsın
    cevap<n><pl><nom> : cevaplar
    cevap<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p2><sg> : cevapsın
    yurt<n><pl><nom> : yurtlar
    yurt<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p2><sg> : yurtsun
    güç<n><pl><nom> : güçler
    güç<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p2><sg> : güçsün
    ağaç<n><pl><nom> : ağaçlar
    ağaç<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p2><sg> : ağaçsın
    köpek<n><pl><nom> : köpekler
    köpek<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p2><sg> : köpeksin
    kulak<n><pl><nom> : kulaklar
    kulak<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p2><sg> : kulaksın

  "[twol] nouns with always variant cons, voiced":
    kitap<n><dat> : kitaba
    kitap<n><px3sp><nom> : kitabı
    cevap<n><dat> : cevaba
    cevap<n><px3sp><nom> : cevabı
    yurt<n><dat> : yurda
    yurt<n><px3sp><nom> : yurdu
    güç<n><dat> : güce
    güç<n><px3sp><nom> : gücü
    ağaç<n><dat> : ağaca
    ağaç<n><px3sp><nom> : ağacı
    köpek<n><dat> : köpeğe
    köpek<n><px3sp><nom> : köpeği
    kulak<n><dat> : kulağa
    kulak<n><px3sp><nom> : kulağı

  "[twol] interaction with epenthetic vowels":
    nakit<n><px3sp><nom> : nakti
